Maine, session 132, LD13.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 21-A MRSA §611 is enacted to read:
§611. Production and Delivery of Election Materials Fund
1. Fund established. The Production and Delivery of Election Materials Fund, a
nonlapsing, interest-bearing Other Special Revenue Funds account within the Department
of the Secretary of State, referred to in this section as "the fund," is established for the
purpose of receiving funds from the State to support the costs associated with the
production and delivery of election materials as required under this Title, including, but not
limited to, ballots, absentee ballot envelopes, voter registration applications, forms,
instructions and other election supplies. The use of funds from the fund is in addition to
any funds received by the Department of the Secretary of State from the State for this
purpose.
2. Funding. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, on or before
September 30, 2025, and every September 30th thereafter, the State Controller shall
transfer $266,000 from the unappropriated surplus of the General Fund to the Department
of the Secretary of State, Bureau of Corporations, Elections and Commissions program,
Production and Delivery of Election Materials Fund Other Special Revenue Funds account
to support the costs associated with the production and delivery of election materials
pursuant to subsection 1, except that, beginning December 1, 2026, the transfer amount
must be adjusted every 2 years based on the Consumer Price Index as reported by the
United States Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics and rounded to the nearest
amount divisible by $100.
3. Carry forward; transfer of funds. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, the State Controller shall carry forward any remaining balances in the Department
of the Secretary of State, Bureau of Corporations, Elections and Commissions program,
General Fund account at the end of fiscal year 2025-26 and each fiscal year thereafter into
the following fiscal year and shall transfer those balances each fiscal year to the Department
of the Secretary of State, Bureau of Corporations, Elections and Commissions program,
Production and Delivery of Election Materials Fund Other Special Revenue Funds account.
Sec. 2. Working group to study polling places at schools reconvened. The
Department of the Secretary of State shall convene a working group, referred to in this
section as "the working group," to study the use of school buildings as polling places, to
consider options to protect the security of school students and staff, election staff and voters
and to consider polling place accessibility. The department shall provide the necessary
staffing services to the working group.
1. The working group consists of 9 members as follows:
A. The Secretary of State or the secretary's designee;
B. The deputy secretary of state of the bureau of corporations, elections and
commissions within the Department of the Secretary of State or the deputy secretary's
designee;
C. The Commissioner of Education or the commissioner's designee;
D. A representative of the Maine School Boards Association, appointed by the
Secretary of State;
Page 1 - 132LR0044(01)

E. A representative of the Maine School Superintendents Association, appointed by
the Secretary of State;
F. A representative of the Maine Town and City Clerks' Association, appointed by the
Secretary of State;
G. A representative of the Maine Municipal Association, appointed by the Secretary
of State;
H. A representative of an organization dedicated to advancing the legal rights of
individuals with disabilities, appointed by the Secretary of State; and
I. A representative of an organization dedicated to the protection of voters who are
from historically underrepresented or marginalized communities, appointed by the
Secretary of State.
2. To the extent possible, membership in the working group must be the same as the
working group convened under Resolve 2023, chapter 73. Members of the working group
are not compensated for their participation in the working group.
3. The working group shall:
A. Identify the number of school buildings in the State that are designated as polling
places;
B. Examine and identify practices in other states around the use of school buildings as
polling places;
C. Evaluate the criteria necessary to protect the security of school students and staff,
election staff and voters when school buildings are used as polling places;
D. Identify possible changes to practices around the use of school buildings as polling
places to protect voter accessibility and to safeguard the security of school students and
staff, election staff and voters when a school building is used as a polling place; and
E. Make recommendations based on the findings of the working group.
4. No later than December 15, 2025, the Department of the Secretary of State shall
submit a report that includes the findings and recommendations of the working group,
including suggested legislation, to the Joint Standing Committee on Veterans and Legal
Affairs. The committee may report out legislation based on the report to the Second Regular
Session of the 132nd Legislature.